src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-tjaala_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - tjála: # N_ODD_OPEN (nom.sg. with open final syllable, geminate c-grad between I-II)
    tjála+N+Sg+Nom: tjála
    tjála+N+Sg+Gen: tjállaga
    tjála+N+Sg+Acc: tjállagav
    tjála+N+Sg+Ill: tjállagij
    tjála+N+Sg+Ine: tjállagin
    tjála+N+Sg+Ela: [tjállagist, tjállagis]
    tjála+N+Sg+Com: tjállagijn
    tjála+N+Pl+Nom: tjállaga
    tjála+N+Pl+Gen: tjállagij
    tjála+N+Pl+Acc: tjállagijt
    tjála+N+Pl+Ill: tjállagijda
    tjála+N+Pl+Ine: tjállagijn
    tjála+N+Pl+Ela: [tjállagijst, tjállagijs]
    tjála+N+Pl+Com: [tjállagij, tjállagijgum]
    tjála+N+Ess: tjállagin
    tjála+N+Abe: tjállagahtá

 
    tjála+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjállagatj
    tjála+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: tjállagatja
    tjála+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: tjállagatjav
    tjála+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: tjállagatjij
    tjála+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ine: tjállagatjin
    tjála+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ela: [tjállagatjist, tjállagatjis]
    tjála+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: tjállagatjijn
    tjála+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: tjállagatja
    tjála+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen: tjállagatjij
    tjála+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc: tjállagatjijt
    tjála+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill: tjállagatjijda
    tjála+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine: tjállagatjijn
    tjála+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela: [tjállagatjijst, tjállagatjijs]
    tjála+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com: [tjállagatjij, tjállagatjijgum]
    tjála+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess: tjállagatjin
 
